errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#logát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#logát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#logát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:htta%>#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:htta%>#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:htta%>#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>t#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:đa%>jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:htta%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:đa%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:htta%>#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:htta%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:htta%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:htta%>#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:đa%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:đa%>t#logi%>n K ;



LEXICON CIEZA
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:ehča%> K ; ! 
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:hčči%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:hči%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:ži%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn K ;

LEXICON CIEZANUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
vihtta#logát#lohkái:vi VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#logát#lohkái:gu VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
čieža#nuppe#lohkái:či CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
čieža#goalmmát#lohkái:či CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
gieža#nuppe#lohkái:gi CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
gieža#goalmmát#lohkái:gi CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
vihtta#logát#lohkái:vi VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
guhtta#logát#lohkái:gu VIHTTALOGATLOHKAI ;
čieža#nuppe#lohkái:či CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
čieža#goalmmát#lohkái:či CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
gieža#nuppe#lohkái:gi CIEZANUPPELOHKAI ;
gieža#goalmmát#lohkái:gi CIEZAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođi#vihtta#logi:čuođi#vi VIHTTALOGI ;
čuođi#guhtta#logi:čuođi#gu VIHTTALOGI ;
okta#čuohti#vihtta#logi:okta#čuohti#vi VIHTTALOGI ;
okta#čuohti#guhtta#logi:okta#čuohti#gu VIHTTALOGI ;
čuohti#vihtta#logi:čuohti#vi VIHTTALOGI ;
čuohti#guhtta#logi:čuohti#gu VIHTTALOGI ;
